Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-539
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact the Uniform Protected Series Act.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 40;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 20.